src-fst-morphology-phonology.twolc.md
# Skolt Sámi TWOLC file

This file documents the [phonology.twolc file](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-sms/blob/main/src/fst/phonology.twolc) 

# Introduction
The twolc rule file for Skolt Saami is divided into 5 main sections:
1. Alphabets, Sets and Definitions
1. Consonant shift rules (tbw)
1. Vowel alternation rules
1. Consonant gradation rules
1. Rules for cleaning up and composing end result

# Alphabets, sets and definitions

## Alphabet

Regular letters:

```
* a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z
* A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z
* ä å â õ
* Ä Å Â Õ
* č ǩ ǯ ǧ ž đ ǥ ʒ š ŋ
* Č Ǩ Ǯ Ǧ Ž Đ Ǥ Ʒ Š Ŋ
* ẹ Pedagogical purposes
* Ẹ Pedagogical purposes
* 
* æ ø ö á é í
* Æ Ø Ö Á
* É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ù Ì Ë Ü Ï Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý þ Ñ Ð
* é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ë ü ï ê ô û î ã ý þ ñ ð ß ª ß ç
```

Orthographic, suprasegmental markers:

* `ʹ` - MODIFIER LETTER PRIME: U+02B9 suprasegmental palatization
* `ʼ` - MODIFIER LETTER APOSTROPHE: U+02BC Syllable marker that appears in writing
* `ˈ` - MODIFIER LETTER VERTICAL LINE: U+02C8 as overlong consonant marker that does not appear in writing except for pedagogical purposes

Symbol pairs for consonant lengthening:
* __%{XC%}:m__
* __%{XC%}:n__
* __%{XC%}:v__
* __%{XC%}:d__
* __%{XC%}:r__
* __%{XC%}:l__
* __%{XC%}:k__
* __%{XC%}:ǥ__
* __%{XC%}:s__
* __%{XC%}:š__
* __%{XC%}:z__
* __%{XC%}:ž__

Symbol pairs for vowel length:
* __%{õuØ%}:0__
* __%{ouØ%}:0__
* __%{âõØ%}:0__
* __%{ẹiØ%}:0__
* __%{äaØ%}:0__
* __%{äåØ%}:0__
* __%{eiØ%}:0__
* __%{åoØ%}:0__
* __%{ẹeiØ%}:0__

Symbol pairs for vowel height, by default vowels are low:
* __%{õu%}:õ__
* __%{ou%}:o__
* __%{âõ%}:â__
* __%{ẹi%}:ẹ__
* __%{äa%}:ä__
* __%{äå%}:ä__
* __%{ei%}:e__
* __%{åo%}:å__
* __%{ẹei%}:ẹ__
* __%{âõe%}:â__
* __%{âõäe%}:â__
* __%^1VOW:0__ - Vow dummy i^1VOW>ii, ẹ^1VOW>ẹẹ, a^1VOW>aa, å^1VOW>åå

Trigger symbols:
* __%^Pen:0__ - for combinations 2015-09-28 Miikka
* __%^RmVow:0__ - for removing vowels e, â, a before final consonant in stem
* __%^UltRmVow:0__ - for removing vowels e, â, a after final consonant in stem
* __%^RmCns:0__ - for removing stem final consonant, e.g. final z in ǩeeʹstes:ǩeâsttez ǩeâstta
* __%^VOWLower:0__ - i>e, õ>â, â>ä, u>o, o>å
* __%^VOWRaise:0__ - e>i, ä>e
* __%^U2Õ:0__ - lowers u>õ
* __%^PAL:0__ - Palatalisation
* __%^PALNo:0__ - Palatalisation
* __%^PALI:0__ - Palatalisation
* __%^PALE:0__ - Palatalisation
* __%^PALÄ:0__ - Palatalisation
* __%^PALẸ:0__ - Palatalisation
* __%^PALÂ:0__ - Palatalisation
* __%^PALÕ:0__ - Palatalisation

Penultimate Palatalisation
* __%^PALK:0__ - causes k:ǩ and g:ǧ and ǥ:j

Miscellaneous triggers:
* %^VC:0 Voicing s:z š:ž
* %^Â:0 Indicates placement of â in stem
* %^Br:0 break rule, e.g. eʹč^Br>{ʼØ}č

CHARACTERISTIC BREAKDOWN 2015-02-17

* __%^Allegro:0__ - Allegro in general shortens consonant and preceding vowel
* __%^VV2V:0__ - Shortens vowel
* __%^V2VV:0__ - Lengthens vowel
* __%^CC2C:0__ - Shortens consonant
* __%^CC2CAllegro:0__ - Shortens consonant and preceding vowel
* __%^C2CC:0__ - Lengthens consonant
* __%^CC2CCC:0__ - Strong to Extra Strong consonant
* __%^CCC2C:0__ - Extra Strong to Weak consonant
* __%^CCC2CAllegro:0__ - Extra Strong to Weak consonant
* __%^CCC2CC:0__ - Extra Strong to Strong consonant
* __%^YXX2YX:0__ - Shortens consonant cluster
* __%^YXX2VX:0__ - Consonant cluster to vowel and consonant sijdd:siid
* __%^YXX2VXX:0__ - Consonant cluster to vowel and geminate uvdd:ouʹdd
* __%^YXX2IX:0__ - Consonant cluster to i  and consonant kueʹhtt:kueiʹt
* __%^VX2YXX:0__ - Consonant cluster i/u to j/v
* __%^VXX2YXX:0__ - Consonant cluster i/u to j/v
* __%^KK2ZERO:0__ - nââʹer
* __%^KKK2ZERO:0__ - jeeʹel
* __%^KKK2GG:0__ - Geminate weakening
* __%^KKK2G:0__ - Strong Geminate allegro
* __%^KK2GG:0__ - Geminate weakening jokk:jooǥǥ
* __%^KK2GAllegro:0__ - Geminate weakening in allegro pååss:påz
* __%^K2GG:0__ - Geminate weakening čårrõs:čårrõõzz
* __%^K2GAllegro:0__ - Geminate weakening in allegro čâustõk

Removal of suprasegmentals

* __%{ʹØ%}:0__ - This is modifier letter prime
* __%{ʼØ%}:0__ - used between l, n, j and subsequent j and elsewhere
* __%{ˈ1%}:0__ - This is modifier letter verticle line after diphthongs

This introduces vertical bar after diphth before consonants
* %^Allegro:0 This introduces vertical bar after diphth before consonants

Various semi-vowel alternations
* %^J2I:0 in tuâjj:tuâi
* %^I2J:0 in agent names
* %^I2Zero:0 in agent names

Gradation triggers 2015.01.23
* %^XSt2St:0 Causes weakening from extra strong to strong
* %^XSt2W:0 Causes weakening from extra strong to weak
* %^St2W:0 Causes weakening from strong to weak
* %^W2St:0 Causes strengthening from weak to strong
* %^W2XSt:0 Causes strengthening from weak to extra strong
* %^St2XSt:0 Causes strengthening from strong to extra strong

Other vowel length and consonant length will be phased out
* %^VOWXSH:0 Extra shortens vowel in relation to consonant
* %^VOWXL:0 Extra lengthens vowel in relation to consonant in nouns, for example
* %^CShort:0 Shortening

More triggers, possibly realised as a segment:

<!-- {% raw %} -->
* `X3:0` causes weak grade
* `%{VU%}:u` used with stuuʹl
* `%{Â1%}:0` used with "mainsted" to tell (a story)
* `%{A1%}:0` used with "vuejted" to drive (causative)
* `%{E1%}:0` used with "kåʹmrded" to bow
* `%{E1%}:0` archiform for MODIFIER LETTER ACUTE ACCENT used in stems where the lemma does not contain a MODIFIER LETTER ACUTE ACCENT and yet the paradigm requires one.
* `%{EÂ%}:e` archiform for ie:eâ variation
* `%^IMPSG2:0`
* `%^INDPRSSG3:0`
* `%^PenVow2a:0` Changes penultimate vowel to a; e:a â:a

Hyphen at compound word boundary
* `%^PenVow2a:0` Zero versus hyphen in compounding
* `%^Hyphen:0` at compound word boundary with %-
* `%^NoHyphen:0` at compound word boundary
<!-- {% endraw %} -->

Literal quotes and angles must be escaped (cf morpheme boundaries below):

* »
* «
* >
* <

Morpheme boundaries:
* Derivational prefix
* Derivational suffix
* Inflectional prefix
* Inflectional suffix
* Word boundary for both lexicalised and dynamic compounds
* (exceptional) soft hyphenation point
* Hyphen for question particle
* Compounding rules

End of alphabet definitions

## Sets

* Cns = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x z đ ʒ ǯ č ŋ ǩ ǧ ǥ š ž
  B C D F G H J K L M N P Q R S T V W X Z Đ Ʒ Ǯ Č Ŋ Ǩ Ǧ Ǥ Š Ž ;
* CNoV = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t w x z đ ʒ ǯ č ŋ ǩ ǧ ǥ š ž
  B C D F G H J K L M N P Q R S T W X Z Đ Ʒ Ǯ Č Ŋ Ǩ Ǧ Ǥ Š Ž ;

* CNoJ = b c d f g h k l m n p q r s t v w x z đ ʒ ǯ č ŋ ǩ ǧ ǥ š ž
  B C D F G H K L M N P Q R S T V W X Z Đ Ʒ Ǯ Č Ŋ Ǩ Ǧ Ǥ Š Ž ;

* Vow = a e ẹ i o u å ä â õ
  A E Ẹ I O U Å Ä Â Õ ;
* VowNoIU = a e ẹ o å ä â õ
  A E Ẹ O Å Ä Â Õ ;

* CNoJV = b c d f g h k l m n p q r s t w x z đ ʒ ǯ č ŋ ǩ ǧ ǥ š ž
  B C D F G H K L M N P Q R S T W X Z Đ Ʒ Ǯ Č Ŋ Ǩ Ǧ Ǥ Š Ž ;

* CNoDLRZ = b c f g h j k m n p q s t v w x z đ ǯ č ŋ ǩ ǧ ǥ š ž
  B C F G H J K M N P Q S T V W X Z Đ Ǯ Č Ŋ Ǩ Ǧ Ǥ Š Ž ;

* Ltrs = Vow Cns ;

* Dummy = %^PAL %^PALE %^PALẸ %^PALÕ %^PALÄ %^PALK
  %^CC2C %^CCC2C %^CCC2CC %^YXX2IX %^YXX2YX
  %^KK2GG %^YXX2VX %^KKK2GG %^KKK2ZERO %^C2CC
  %^J2I %^Pen %^V2VV %^VOWLower %^RmVow
  %^PenVow2a %^RmCns %^VC %^V2VV
  %^VOWRaise %^VOWSH %^K2GG %> ; - triggers in Sg.Nom and Sg.Gen (Note word-final right arrow bracket 2024-01-10)

## Definitions

### Short consonant cluster

Onset consonant or word boundary
`OnSetC = [[%{XC%}:Cns\|Cns:Cns] (Cns:\|%{XC%}:Cns) \|.#.\|#:\|%>\](») ;`

Penultimate consonant
`PenUltCns = [Cns:\](%{XC%}:) ;`

following morpheme or word boundary

<!-- {% raw %} -->
```
* RBound = [(%^Hyphen: %-|%^NoHyphen: |%{%-Ø%}:) (∑) #: |.#.|%>|»|%-] ;
```
<!-- {% endraw %} -->

possible triggers before VOWLower and VOWRaise

neutral to vowel length

neutral to vowel height and backness

possible triggers before PALE PALÄ

possible triggers between stem and PALNo and PAL

possible triggers between vowel length and consonant grade

`NeutrVowHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL = [ (%^VOWRaise:\|%^VOWLower:) ( ((%^PALÂ:\|%^PALÕ:) (%^Allegro:) %^PALNo:\|%^VOWLower: %^PALÄ:\|(%^PALÕ:\|%^PALE:\|%^PALÄ:\|%^PALẸ:) (%^Allegro:) %^PAL:)\| (%^Allegro:) (%^PALÕ:\|%^PALE:\|%^PALÄ:\|%^PALẸ:\|%^PALÂ:) (%^PALNo:\](%^PAL:) ) ) ;`

possible triggers between word end and consonant grade

possible triggers between vowel length and Palatalization
`BetweenVowLengthAndPALNo = [(%^VOWLower:\|%^VOWRaise:) (%^PALÄ:\|%^PALE:\|%^PALẸ:\|%^PALÕ:\](%^PALÂ:) ) ;`

`BetweenVowHeightAndConsGrade = [((%^PALE:\|%^PALÄ:\|%^PALẸ:\|%^PALÕ:) (%^Allegro:) %^PAL:\|(%^PALÂ:\](%^PALÕ:) (%^Allegro:) %^PALNo:)) ;`

`BetweenStemAndRightArrow = [NeutrVowLengthHeightDiphPalAllegroPAL BetweenPALNoAndMorphRightArrow] ;`

### Penultimate vowel centers possible triggers before VOWLower and VOWRaise

`PenBetweenStemAndStemFinalVoicing = [PenBetweenStemAndVowelLoss (%^RmVow:\](%^PenVow2a:)) ;`

`PenBetweenPALNoAndMorph = [(%^Pen: [(%^Allegro:) %^CC2C:\|(%^Allegro:) %^CC2CAllegro:]\|%^Pen: %^C2CC:\|%^Pen: %^YXX2YX:\|%^Pen: %^KK2GG:\|%^Pen: %^CC2CCC:\|%^Pen: %^CCC2C:\|%^Pen: %^CCC2CC:\|%^Pen: %^YXX2VX:\|%^Pen: %^YXX2VXX:\](%^Pen: %^KKK2GG:) RBound ) ;`

used in compounding Cmp/SgNom and Cmp/SgGen
`SgNomGen = [((%^PALE: %^PAL:) %^CCC2C:\|(%^PALE: %^PAL:) %^CCC2CC:\|%^PALẸ:\|[%^PALE:\|%^PALÕ:] %^PAL: %^YXX2IX:\|[%^PALẸ:\|%^PALE:] %^PAL: %^YXX2YX:\|((%^PALE:) %^PAL:) %^KK2GG:\|(%^PALE:) %^PAL:\| ((%^PALE:) %^PAL:) (%^J2I:) %^CC2C:\](%^PAL: %^YXX2VX:));`

neutral to consonant length

`CNeutrGrade = [([(%^Allegro:) %^CC2C:\|(%^Allegro:) %^CC2CAllegro:] \|[%^C2CC:] \|%^CC2CCC: \|%^KK2GG: \|%^KKK2GG: \|%^YXX2VX: \|%^YXX2VXX:\](%^CCC2CC: )) ;`

neutral to vowel and consonant length

`NeutrGrade = [VNeutrGrade \](CNeutrGrade) ; `

`NoVowRaise = \[ %^VOWRaise: \| #]* [#\](.#.) ;`

`NoCnsDummy = \[ %^CC2C: \| %^CCC2C: \| %^CCC2CC: \| %^YXX2IX: \| %^YXX2YX: \| %^KK2GG: \| %^YXX2VX: \| %^KKK2GG: \| %^KKK2ZERO: \| %^C2CC: \| %^J2I: \| %^RmCns: \| %^K2GG: \]( # )* ;`

`SurfaceDiphthong = [ :e :ä \| :e :â \| :i :õ \| :i :â \| :i :e \| :i :ẹ \| :u :â \| :u :õ \| :u :å \| :u :ä \| :u :e \]( :u :ẹ ) ;`

* X3 = C Vx Cx Cx     C Vx Vy Cx ˈ Cx
* X2 = C Vx Vx Cx Cx  C Vx Vy Cx Cx
* X1 = C Vx Vx Cx     C Vx Vy Cx

# Rules

## Vowel shortening rules

**Vowel shortening â:0** - used in

čââʹđ+N+Sg+Ill: **heart/sydän**

-â
ǩeʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: **cook/keittää**

* *ǩeâ{ʹØ}tt^VV2V^VOWRaise^PALI^PAL*
* *ǩi0ʹtt0000*

**Vowel shortening ẹ:0** - used in +Ind+Prs+Pl3, +Ind+Prt+Pl3
teevvad+V+Prt+4:
* *tẹẹvv^VV2V^VOWRaise>uš*
* *ti0vv00>uš*

**Vowel shortening e:0** - used in +Ind+Prs+Pl3, +Ind+Prt+Pl3

eʹǩrded+V+Inf
* *eeʹǩǩerd^Pen^VV2V^Pen^CC2C^RmVow>ed*
* *e0ʹǩ00rd00000>ed*

Ââvel+N+Prop+Sg+Loc  **Ivalo**
* *Ââvel^RmVow>est*
* *Ââv0l0>est*

Jouste

**Vowel shortening å:0** - used in +Ind+Prs+Pl3, +Ind+Prt+Pl3
jååʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3 **trekk**
* *jåå{ʹØ}tt^VV2V^VOWRaise^PAL>e*
* *jo0ʹtt000>e*
låʹǧsted

* *lååʹǧǧest^Pen^VV2V^Pen^CC2CAllegro^RmVow*
* *lå0ʹǧ00st00000*

sååbbar+N+Sg+Nom **meeting**
* *så^1VOWbbar^Pen^V2VV*
* *sååbbar00*

-å

**Vowel shortening õ:0** - used in +Ind+Prs+Pl3, +Ind+Prt+Pl3
* *mõõ{ʹØ}nn^VV2V^PAL>e*
* *mõ0ʹnn00>e*
* *mõõ{ʹØ}nn^VV2V^VOWLower^PAL>e*
* *mâ0ʹnn000>e*
* *čõõnâst^Pen^VV2V^RmVow>ed*
* *čõ0n0st000>ed*
tõiŋsǩed+V+Inf
* *tõõiŋâsk^Pen^VV2V^RmVow^PALK>ed*
* *tõ0iŋ0sǩ0000>ed*
* ★*tõõiŋâsk^Pen^VV2V^RmVow^PALK>ed* (is not standard language)
* ★*tõ0iŋ0sk0000>ed* (is not standard language)

kõõnjâl+N+Sg+Gen **tear**
* *kõ^1VOWnnjâl^Pen^VV2V^Pen^C2CC*
* *kõ0nnjâl0000*

-õ

**Vowel shortening u:0** - used in +Ind+Prs+Pl3, +Ind+Prt+Pl3

mainstummuš+N+Sg+Ill: **story telling/tarinointi**
* *mainstummuš^RmVow>a*
* *mainstumm0š0>a*

juurd+N+Ess **thought**
* *ju^1VOWrdd>j>en*
* *ju0rdd>j>en*

Oulu

**Vowel shortening i:0** - used in +Ind+Prs+Pl3, +Ind+Prt+Pl3
viikkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3
* *vii{ʹØ}kk^VV2V^VOWLower^PAL>e*
* *ve0ʹǩǩ000>e*
viikkâd+V+Imprt+Pl3
* *vii{ʹØ}kk^VV2V^VOWLower>az*
* *vẹ00kk00>az*
* ★*vii{ʹØ}kk* `^VV2V:0` (is not standard language ^VOWLower>az)
* ★*vẹẹ0kk00>az* (is not standard language)
iilâsǩ:ilska
